test/src/morphology/A-appwn_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - appõn: # adjectives 235 'eng /est hapu/fin' - full paradigm
     appõn+A+Sg+Nom: appõn
     appõn+A+Sg+Gen: appõn
     appõn+A+Sg+Par: appõnt
     appõn+A+Sg+Dat: appõnõn
     appõn+A+Sg+Ins: appõnõks
     appõn+A+Sg+Ill: appõnõ
     appõn+A+Sg+Ela: appõnõst
     appõn+A+Pl+Nom: appõnd
     appõn+A+Pl+Gen: appõnd
     appõn+A+Pl+Par: appiņi
     appõn+A+Pl+Dat: appõndõn
     appõn+A+Pl+Ins: appõndõks
     appõn+A+Pl+Ill: appiņiž
     appõn+A+Pl+Ela: appiņist
